Dear Readers…

Today was the first time I mailed out a “subscriber-only” letter. I shared my logic for paid subscriptions a few weeks ago here. From now one, I will make certain letters subscribers only, typically those more closely tied to the investment outlook. If you want to read The Outlook and Ms. Eilish, sign up. If not, we will re-connect next week!
Wednesday we release the next podcast, a conversation with Dr. Alexander Vanyukov, a Moscow heart surgeon who has been on the Covid front-line. He describes watching his hospital get overwhelmed, putting out a call for volunteers and then the surprising experience of what happened next.

The Outlook and Ms. Eilish

Over there, said Billie Eilish, wearing a baggy white T-shirt, shorts and hi-tops, waving toward a section in the crowd. In the VIP section, you guys doing all right?
Fu@# the VIPS! Boomed the crowd packed around me.
The anger came from some place deep (I’m paraphrasing, I didn’t record the precise words). This emotion may come from the fact that young people probably face slow, volatile, economic growth, a chaotic information landscape and see problems like global warming as both scary and without an obvious solution. Polling seems to confirm this sentiment. Given that, the biggest investment risk is less a shift in inflation and more a radical shift in the system—and not just in the US.
When it comes to investing, I follow a practice. Here are the steps:
a)     Have a framework (covered in Part 1 last week) to make an investment decision,
b)	Guess what future conditions will look like, including possible low probability events,
c) 	Know how different investments—stocks versus bonds—react to events,
d)	Look at what an investment costs and how it’s priced relative to other assets—ideally you find a Mercedes priced like a Hyundai.
Today, I will cover “b,” the outlook, and in subsequent posts will cover the rest. Disclaimer: This is not investment advice. You can and will lose money on investments. I’ve lost money on plenty of investments.
The Outlook
We are in a pandemic, which will pass. What follows next will likely be a period of low growth that self-reinforcingly feeds political instability even as innovation continues to eliminate the middle-man. I come up with this by unpacking growth, inflation and the risk of a systematic break.  
Growth
Growth, as I noted last week, measures spending. A pandemic creates volatile swings in spending. Spending on hotel rooms essentially drops to zero, while demand for face masks explodes. While we are in the pandemic it is tough to understand what exactly is going on with the economy because the dials on the dashboard keep swinging around so much, like a plane going through really bad weather.
Longer term, growth has three parts: income, borrowing and demographics.
a)     Income goes up or down depending on the job you hold (brain surgeon versus butcher), overall employment and inventiveness, or productivity. Inventiveness is producing more with less, the tractor replacing a plow.   Over the last decades, US productivity has grown at about 2% a year. This creates a speed limit on growth. The IT revolution is having a huge impact on inflation (more on this below) but does not appear to be as economically transformative as past inventions, like electricity.
b)     Debt is spending tomorrow’s money today. Debt levels are now high in most major economies. It means that future has already been spent. The chart below by Rose puts the dollars of debt into perspective.

c) Demographics. In the next decade, the global population will grow in places like Nigeria, India and Pakistan and shrink in Europe, Japan and China. As an investor, you care about the growth of places with safe asset markets. On that count, the US, Canada and Australia have a structural advantage because they have systems that both attract and integrate immigrants well, even if their birth rates are similar to Europe.
In sum, growth probably isn’t going to be very fast, but will be slightly faster in places that attract immigrants and encourage industry disruption, absent a radical, unexpected shift in productivity.
Inflation
Inflation is the average price of the stuff you buy. It is currently high, like 4% or 5%, mostly because of pandemic-related supply-chain disruptions, like temporary port shutdowns. Inflation matters because your money buys less. When I was growing up, the grocery bill was around $100 plus. Now it is $200 plus. Same food, but my dollars buy less. You can find a more fulsome discussion of inflation in Deflationary Locusts.
I suspect inflation will fall as the pandemic supply chain blocks ease, population growth slows or in some cases shrinks and because much of today’s innovation is about eliminating the middle-man. Consider Amazon, which existed for almost a decade (94-03) without making a profit, systematically picking off the middle-man, financed with a soaring share price. The deflation Amazon created allowed the central bank to run easy policy, further boosting Amazon’s share price, what I referred to as our stock market addiction.
This process continues (Carvana to car dealerships, Upwork to accountants and graphic designers, etc). The big areas of the US that have not yet succumbed to this are education and medical. Covid may change this. If learning is partially on-line, maybe one great calculus teacher can replace thousands of mediocre ones? If so, that would reduce education costs and likely boost quality.
A System Breakdown
Low growth weakens confidence in the political system, which then fuels the angry burst evident at an otherwise upbeat and fun Eilish concert. Wealth gets destroyed when political systems fracture. Civil wars are more frequent when growth is low, the government is seen as unresponsive, rule of law is weak, antagonists are unable to negotiate and information channels are chaotic.   
This seems to fit a number of countries, including the US, parts of Europe and China. For instance, in the US, inhabitants on the wealthy coasts have a political agenda at odds with those who live in rural areas, who are are over-represented in the Senate. This tension on everything from election integrity to abortion risks creating a Constitutional crisis. In authoritarian countries like China the slower the growth gets, the tighter their controls need to be, which also threatens the system.
Over time, the list of countries that have experienced such a break is long and is most evident in their currency, which typically becomes worthless when populist parties undertake irresponsible monetary and fiscal policies. Obviously, a scary thought. The chart below from Rose shows currencies in log scale against gold (as a reference point). The point: when the system breaks, wealth gets wiped out. The groceries don’t cost $200, they cost $20,000, which is a risk I consider in my asset allocation. More on that, later.

Volunteerism In The Time of Covid

Alexander Vanyukov is a heart surgeon in Moscow, husband and father of two. Like all of us, Covid turned his life upside down. Only, he wasn’t hiding out in a country house making as needed dashes for groceries. He was at ground zero in a hazmat suit and goggles trying to prevent some of Russia’s 200,000 reported Covid deaths. Excess mortality suggests the actual figure is closer to 600,000.
As regular readers know, while I grew up in the US, I am fascinated by foreign cultures, particularly Russia. I’ve seen the pendulum swing from Soviet Union as enemy, to Russia as friend and back to Russia the enemy. When we are in the enemy phase, I detect a hardening of perspectives about the humanity of not just the government but the people of whomever one country or another holds as the current enemy. That’s why Alexander’s story leapt out. You can listen to the conversation here and also on Apple.
A few lessons I took away.
“If you need help, just ask.” Alexander saw a hospital overwhelmed and came up with the idea of putting out the call for volunteers. He thought a few people would respond. Thousands reached out.
Getting an outsider’s perspective is invaluable. “Their lack of medical experience and typical patient interactions was incredibly useful because they weren’t desensitized to the patients’ needs as most of the doctors are. So they were able to see certain issues, like someone who hasn’t been approached for a while, a lot more quickly than the medical staff,” he said.
Russia is experiencing a “crisis of trust.” Accomplishing difficult things that require a joint effort is so much harder where distrust is the starting point. I see the same thing in the US.
If you enjoy these podcasts, please rate them on Apple and spread the word about Things I Didn’t Learn in school to your own personal network. That makes a huge difference. You can also help by switching your membership to paid, which supports the team behind this.
Enjoy.
Paul and the Still Press team

The Art of Not Destroying Wealth

Then I went broke, said the investor, now very wealthy. He was recalling a time when he lost it all.
At least he made the money back. I know a number of people who did not, typically when circumstances shifted in ways that were hard to foresee and impossible to recover from. A sudden lurch from a crazy political leader, plague, or the economy.
Wealth is unstable. It’s hard to earn and easy to lose. Many of the people, companies and countries that have money now won’t in the future. If you sit on cash, inflation eats away your stash. Right now, US inflation is around 4%, the yield on cash is zero, meaning cash is guaranteed to lose 4% a year! If you take market risk, you take risk. We must live with this uncertainty, even smile at it.
The chart below created by Rose Technology illustrates this. It shows the top countries in terms of GDP per capita going back … 1000 years. The country with the highest GDP per capita in 1150 was Iraq, as of 2016 the order was Qatar, Norway, USE, Luxembourg, etc.
Today’s post is the third in a series answering the subscriber question: what is the big picture and what should I do about it? I first shared my investment framework, then my outlook, today is about what to do. Post-pandemic, the most likely outcome is low growth and low inflation BUT the political risks are so high now growth and inflation almost don’t matter.
In particular, the US and China, the two largest economies in the world, are both threatened by a cult of personality. This undermines the rule of law (stronger in the US to begin with) and threatens wealth. The recent article by Robert Kagan about Trump and George Soros about Xi are both important.
Asset Allocation
Asset allocation is both boring and important. An abbreviated version.
When you invest your savings, you are participating in what’s called a capital market.
A market for capital is different than, say, a farmer’s market. Unlike buying an apple, when you invest, there are two steps. First spend money, then get the money back. Call it renting out your capital.
There are three primary risks when you rent out your cash: you don’t get repaid, you get repaid in money that isn’t worth what it once was or your payment gets delayed, sometimes for years. Visualize a tenant not paying, or paying in money that is losing value very quickly or paying after a protracted legal fight. In Wall Street lingo, these risks are called default, inflation or illiquidity.
Rent can be structured in different ways. The structure is important to understand because it relates to how to protect yourself from wealth shifts. There are three primary structures:
a. 	A loan, also called a bond.  If the risk is low, the interest rate is low. If the risk is higher the interest rate is higher. Either way, a bond is a contract. If the government borrows, your risk of default is low. If a new tech start-up borrows, the risk is higher.
b. 	A share of the business. This is also called a stock or an equity. It means you own a slice of the business. The owner is under no obligation to pay you back. If the business does well the return can be much, much higher than a bond. If it is bad, you get nothing.
c. Switching your currency. This means you get paid your rent not in dollars (or whatever your home country is) but in gold, bitcoin or some other material that can be exchanged for currency.
The art of not destroying wealth is to hold a bit of everything. My starting point is 1/3 bonds, 1/3 stocks and 1/3 some form of “switch your currency.” Government bonds are good when things are bad, like 2008. Stocks are good when things are good, like this year. Switching the currency provides protection when your home country goes bad, either due to inflation or a demagogue.
So for instance, if I bought a house in Canada and rented it out, this would be like a bond (the rent) but also switching my currency, I’m paid in Canadian dollars. Or buying the stock of a foreign company that produces commodities. This is a share of a business but also switching my currency (the commodity they produce).
At the same time, and this is why investing is tricky, I don’t follow this rubric rigidly. Also, THIS IS NOT INVESTMENT ADVICE, YOU CAN AND WILL LOSE MONEY, I HAVE MANY TIMES. I deviate from the above, particularly around what I’d refer to as the gas and the brake.
The Gas and Brake
Only the government can create money. Printing money is stepping on the gas. Reducing money is stepping on the brake. If the government, reduces the supply of money, assets fall. Most of what you earn on an asset allocation comes from when the government is stepping on the gas. So be mindful when they step on the brake. Right now, the US is planning to step on the gas a bit less hard. That’s one reason why the stock market stopped going up.
Next week, for subscribers. I’ll share my current asset allocation in more detail. If you are enjoying these, become a paid subscriber.

My Bets

“I never had a long-term plan. I plan six months ahead. A series of six months plans is a long-term plan.”
It was the early 2000s. I was trying to leave the lumbering commercial bank where I worked. An entrepreneur friend was describing his thinking to me. The same applies to managing money. I try to see through the fog, probabilistically, six months out.
This post is the fourth and final in a series answering a subscriber’s question: what is the bottom line, what are your bets? First I provided a framework for such decisions, then an investment outlook, then a tutorial about how different assets work. Today’s piece is the most technical. Hopefully, all four of the pieces fit together as one.
The “lull” I’ve referred to throughout is a period of time where risky assets like stocks and commodities do well before we face a shift that may be terrible for assets. A rapid Fed tightening and what I’ve called the cult of personality in both the US and China are real risks.
A caveat: THE BELOW IS NOT INVESTMENT ADVICE. INVESTMENT IS RISKY, YOU CAN AND WILL LOSE MONEY. I find people talk about money the way they talk about sex, in private, and suspect we’d probably do better to talk more openly about our investments, compare notes and learn.
Below is my current portfolio. The numbers are as a percent of capital. If I had $100 in my portfolio, $42 is long stocks.
Here is my thinking:
My goal is to earn a 5% to 10% return each year with roughly 10% risk. Managing a portfolio is a trade-off between risk and return. There is a mathematical relationship between these two numbers, confidence in each investment and the ability of certain investments to reduce risk. (This math is what investment pros describe as an “information ratio,” the expected return divided by the expected risk.) Suffice to say, you need to know your own goals and risk tolerance and think about what can hurt you.
My starting point is 1/3 stocks, 1/3 bonds and 1/3 switch your currency. I then deviate depending on conditions. Switch your currency means a combination of commodities like gold and copper plus actual foreign currencies that protects against both inflation and a sharp decline in one’s home currency.
Stocks. I own more stocks than my typical. I think we are in a gradual, post-Covid recovery that will be good for earnings and the alternatives, bonds, are generally unattractive. Half my stocks are foreign as I worry about how expensive many US stocks are.
In the US, I am concentrated in banks, tech and oil. Each sector has its own dynamic. A bank borrows short term and lends long term. To over simplify, as the difference between these interest rates (short and long) rise, a bank makes more money. That’s what is happening now. Oil is unrelated (diversifying) to other stocks (more below) given the substance they produce as a profit is an expense for most other businesses. My US tech exposure is about 5% of my total portfolio. Given a roughly 20% exposure to US stocks, if they fall 20%, I lose 4%. I can handle that even if I won’t like it. The above stock allocation is very different than the typical asset allocation a financial advisor recommends. That is a separate discussion.
Bonds. I hold less bonds than normal and no US government bonds. The real interest rate on bonds is solidly negative. Effectively, I have to pay the US government for them to borrow my money. I own foreign government bonds, some of which are in emerging markets, and securities with higher yields from US government insured borrowers. I partially hedged the risk the Fed raises rates by going short the interest rates they might increase. In other words, short-term US bonds are unattractive to own but attractive to hedge. The chart below shows the type of scenario I worry about. It shows this current portfolio (minus the hedge) drawn back through time during a recent Fed rate hike. It loses a lot of money.
I have more than 1/3 of my money in “switch your currency.” This is reflected in outright exposure to foreign currencies (36%) but also in my exposures to real estate and commodities. Recognize if you buy a foreign stock, you own the stock and the currency. There are two things driving my switch-your-currency-bets. First, global warming will drive increased demand for raw materials to mute the impact, like flood control and air conditioning, which are commodity intensive.  So too is green energy. Many of these stocks also provide high dividends, which provides some income. Second, given stimulative policy in the US and generally less stimulative policy abroad, the relative attractiveness of foreign currencies and hard assets is higher than average.
I have exposure to both an equally balanced asset allocation, a number of hedge funds and credit managers. This is me outsourcing some of the money management to others.
My overall exposure is above 100%, meaning I use modest amounts of leverage in my portfolio. That is also a separate discussion.
As the facts change, my asset allocation changes. Most of this is liquid, meaning I can sell it in a day. Fingers crossed.

Ray Dalio, Unplugged

It’s hard enough to know ourselves, let alone others. We are contradictions, moods and degrees of disclosure and so are those we try to understand. Observer and observed are in motion. Those familiar to us also remain elusive.
I first met Ray in the summer of 2004. Bridgewater Associates, the company he founded, had around 150 people. I asked around Wall Street and people said Ray was unusual and wrote great research. (I now think he writes great research because he is unusual). Bridgewater wasn’t famous, even though Ray had been assiduously building it since … 1975. There were no written principles.
I worked for Ray for sixteen years, retiring last year. In that time, I watched Ray go from hard working and obscure to hard working and famous. Bridgewater became the biggest hedge fund in the world and Ray became a billionaire. The last time I was in China with him, people stopped us to take his photograph.
While I often experienced Ray’s sometimes impossibly high standards first hand, there was still a lot I didn’t know about him. In our conversation I purposely skipped his economic outlook, views on China and principles. Much of that is available on-line.
Instead, I wanted to ask him some of the questions he asked me in my 2004 job interview. What growing up was like? How did he find his path?  If he was comfortable, I also wanted to discuss every parent’s worst nightmare, losing a child. I appreciated his candor and think you will as well.
You can listen for yourself with this link. The podcast is also on Apple podcasts and my website.
I took away a few lessons.
1. Early in life, independent thinkers might seem merely quirky rather than possessing unique insight.
2. Ray didn’t start out trying to create a great company; he had curiosities and wanted to follow them in a way that generated enough money to live. Bridgewater grew out of that.
3. Great analysts sometimes get forecasts egregiously wrong.
4. We all experience loss. While always painful, when it happens out of the normal sequence, like the child dying before the parent, it is excruciating.
Likely you will have different take aways. I’m all ears.

A Diabolical Challenge

Money is both a constant in human life and constantly unstable, like the ocean.  Sometimes money lurches from one market to another, like a stock market crash. Sometimes prices begin to rise, like now. Eggs cost 12% more than a year ago. An egg is an egg, you just pay more for it. If your wealth is fixed and eggs cost more, effectively you are now poorer.
Inflation is tricky for investors. Some of the assets most commonly owned, like stocks, generally don’t do well when inflation becomes a problem (though they have done well this year). Once people become alert to inflation, the assets that can help protect are already expensive.  And, if in response, the central bank sharply reduces the amount of money it is printing all assets fall.
To deal with this, professional investors resort to other techniques, like futures and shorting that are not a good idea for the untrained.  Shorting in brief: Say a box of eggs costs $10. I can short it by saying, “I’ll pay you $10 for your eggs…in a month.” I borrow your eggs and sell them for $10 that day. When the price of eggs falls to, say, $5 in a month, I buy the eggs and give you yours back. I sold for $10 and bought for $5, making $5. Like I said, shorting is complicated.
The Problem
Economists can not reliably predict when inflation is going to shift higher or lower because inflation has too many moving parts.  Inflation is the average price of a pile of stuff, from semi-conductors to cement. While keeping track of all the moving parts is impossible, as a hack I reduce inflation to just three pieces: labor, raw materials and housing.  
For everything you buy, someone needs to make it (labor) and transport it (raw materials), and all involved need a roof over their head. That’s inflation. The below chart shows actual CPI, as reported by the government, and then an estimate (thanks Rose!) that is 66% labor, 17% commodities and 17% housing. It tracks pretty well and you can see the prices jump recently.

In the US over the next 10 years, inflation is expected to be about 2.5%. This isn’t an opinion. This number is extracted from the bond market by looking at the difference between what’s called a nominal bond and an inflation-linked bond. This measure of expectations is objective, like your weight on a scale.
Inflation right now is around 5%. This means the market believes inflation will fall from here (from 5% to 2.5%). I suspect that is right. Think labor, commodities and shelter. Tens of millions of people are seeing their jobs disrupted, which has created supply/demand imbalances as has an exodus from cities to suburbs. That said, I could be wrong, so I need to have a plan.
Least-Worst Solutions
There are three assets that might help an investor navigate inflation: real estate, commodities and inflation-linked bonds. Real estate and commodities are almost intuitive. If you think food prices were going to spike further, it makes some sense to fill your home or apartment with food today and eat it tomorrow. Wherever inflation settles the real estate and commodities will sell at that price.  
Inflation-linked bonds are less familiar, technical and a topic a reader asked about. An IL-bonds pay you real (inflation-adjusted) interest. That means if inflation rises further from here, you get more money, which would help. It also means an inflation linked bond has two moving parts, a real yield and inflation compensation. A regular ten-year nominal bond yields 1.7% thus can be divided into a roughly 2.5% expected inflation rate and a negative real yield.  Why would you buy a bond with a negative real yield?
Because yields on cash are even lower. Cash is zero and inflation is 5%, meaning real cash yields are -5%.  If there is a fundamental force in markets, like nuclear energy, it is these real yields. When cash is a terrible investment it forces money out into the economy and markets. These yields impact every asset you can buy.
IL-bond real yields can rise (hurting an investor) in one of two ways—either inflation falls (and real yields thus rise) or the Fed raises rates.  The long-term chart below shows the relationship of interest rates to a popular nominal bond ETF. When the Fed raises rates, it is not pretty. An inflation linked bond will look even worse.
From here, inflation likely falls or I am wrong and it rises and the Fed acts. If inflation rises further and the Fed does nothing, inflation linked bonds are a good deal. That could happen, but investing is about making good risk reward decisions. Given how low short-term interest rates are right now, the cost of selling short-term bonds is low. These are the interest rates the Fed would raise. While this is NOT investment advice and you can and will lose money investing, for transparency my inflation hedge is a roughly 30% short on short-term interest rates, 10% long commodities and 8% long real estate.  I don’t hold any inflation linked bonds.

Boom, Bust and Redemption

A few weeks ago, I wrote about The Art of Not Destroying Wealth. Wealth is unstable, hard to accrue and easy to lose. The latest podcast is a case study in both the art of gaining it, a case study in how to lose it and, perhaps more importantly, a discussion of how to keep perspective as the world’s perception of you gyrates.
My guest Dan Zwirn is a sophisticated investor who provides finance of the type I read about in books from writers like Honore de Balzac and Victor Hugo. There have always been complicated flows of borrowing and lending, transactions a bureaucratic bank can’t get in the middle of but if you can figure out the details and collateral and have an appetite for risk, you can make a bundle.
Dan had the idea for this type of company … in his 20s. By his 30s, the company was a reality. He was managing billions and was worth hundreds of millions of dollars. It’s an understatement to say that type of vision, drive and execution at that age is rare.
Then, disaster.
I’ve always been wary of the authorities. The authorities to me mean the IRS, state police, local police, anyone who legally has the right to abridge my liberty. When I’ve been in authoritarian countries, I’ve been cautious about the secret police as well. These structures exist in different forms and to different degrees in every country. They have enormous power.
For a US hedge fund, the dominant regulatory authority is the SEC, the Securities and Exchange Commission. Dan identified and self-reported an issue at his fund to the SEC, thinking self-reporting was the right thing to do.
The SEC agreed with him. However, agreement came in writing many years later. Between reporting to the SEC1 and getting a letter from them saying he hadn’t done anything wrong (but a CFO had), Dan lost his wealth. Now he is re-building his original vision. This is his story.
What’s it like to go boom to bust and bounce back? Probably different for everyone. Dan found comfort in the Stoics (note to self, read more classics). Think Seneca or Marcus Aurelius.
By the way, on the topic of wealth shifts, Sunday’s paid post was about navigating inflation, including about the potential risks of a less known instrument called an inflation-linked bond. For whatever reason, the market action in the ensuing days is the very type of thing I was worried about. Let’s see if it lasts.
If you enjoy Things I Didn’t Learn in School consider becoming a paid member, that’s what supports the team that makes this happen.

Does Profit Snuff Out Inovation

The magic of 007 broke when “M” downed whiskey after whiskey in his office. We know fiction is an invention, yet still feel disappointment when that becomes obvious. Today smoking in the office is verboten and the head of British Intelligence is knocking back Macallan at work?
The narrative logic for a film series is brand consistency, not innovation. Bond is a formula; profit creates an impediment to innovation. The same is true for the established company.  A tried and true structure and solid results give the appearance of permanence but also sow the seeds of collapse. Knowing this is critical for both investing and career management.
I wrote before about how All Companies Die. The median time a company is in the Dow Jones Industrial Average is 10 years. The latest 007 film is a reminder of why. Like the Bond films, the profitable corporation is often the vision of an eccentric, self-promoting creative. Once a formula is discovered, however, significant creativity ends and tinkering begins.
Consider the parallels between Apple founder Steve Jobs and 007 creator Ian Fleming, both of whom died young and left cash flow empires.  Each re-imagined an existing idea. Ian Fleming made Eric Ambler’s understated hero suave and wry, added gadgets, beautiful women, cartoonish bad guys and locations more aspirational than Eastern Europe.  Jobs looked at Epson laptops and Motorola cell phones and realized they could be much better designed.  “He liked the notion of simple and clean modernism produced for the masses,” biographer Walter Isaacson wrote.
Both died at age 56 having invented a score others now play, over and over.  In Job’s case the direct descendent is Tim Cook. In Flemming’s, it is Michael Wilson and Barbara Brocolli who own Eon Productions and retain creative control over the 007 films.
The chart below from Rose (thanks Rose!) shows the return on the 007 franchise, which is profitable and seeing gradually diminishing returns per dollar invested. The empire is fading but not to such a degree as to provoke real innovation.  

Playing the music requires a) scale and b) great musicians. Followers are different than founders.  It takes arrogance and impulsivity to create an empire and humility and consistency to work in one. Jobs’ reality distortion field is familiar to anyone working as an entrepreneur; you need to summon confidence in something that doesn’t yet exist. In the orchestra, scope for creativity exists but is far more constrained. This is not to denigrate the orchestra. All work is noble and it takes unbelievable discipline to learn to do something well, like play the violin.
About 147,000 people work at Apple. You can analyze Apple’s numbers in different ways. One of them is how many business lines were created after Steve Jobs. Most Apple sales come from the Mac (released in 1984), iPhone (released in 2007), and iPad (2010), or services tied to these products, like Apple Care. By this measure, post-Jobs innovation is close to zero, as the chart shows.

Yet, profits were almost $60 billion in 2020, more than twice what they were when Jobs died. Apple is not an isolated example. Microsoft replaced the typewriter and graph paper with word and excel.  This cash flow supports 163,000 employees.  The meaningful evolution post-Bill Gates is cloud computing, perhaps forced because Google, Apple and others began to encroach on Office.

While stock valuations are elevated now, going forward something will shift (though exactly when I don’t know), profits will fall and, in the case of companies that die collapse. Could a hardening of trade barriers between China and the US and a government led push for self-reliance eviscerate a large swath of these companies’ profits?  The very people that make existing operations run smoothly are the same type of people unlikely to undertake radical adjustments.
For those early in their career, this means you need to match your gifts with the right type of company. If you work in a company as established as 007, the music has already been written. The company needs excellent violin players, not composers. Creativity is, if anything, a problem. If, however, you are a tight operator and excellent violin player, these corporations can be a great place to work, until conditions shift.
As an investor, I try to be open minded to disruption.  The rewards for knocking down a giant are massive.  This is the reason why Elon Musk has achieved cult status. The market is saying in 15 to 20 years we won’t have gas driven cars and he more than anyone else has made this happen, a true composer, though I suspect he has largely hired violin players.
Let me know your thoughts, paul@paulpodolsky.com. Reader feedback helps shape subsequent posts. And please consider becoming a paid subscriber, which helps support my team.

The Nest, the Soul and the Calculator

Numbers imperfectly capture reality. For instance, we measure each minute the same and experience some as fleeting and others as interminable. The same is true when it comes to real estate; buying property probably doesn’t make sense strictly in terms of numbers but might make sense from the perspective of emotional safety, family memories and community.
A younger reader asked about how to think about a real estate purchase, thus today’s post.  I made my first real estate investment because owning a home made my wife, who grew up in the cramped Soviet Union apartment, happy.  In other words, pure emotion. All money decisions are emotional, but housing is different because:
1. 	Unlike buying a stock or a bond, you will live inside this asset. The word house is different from “home.” The oldest tales, like The Odyssey, are about finding your way home. For many, buying a property is also, frankly, about reproduction. Salmon meet in the cities and spawn in the suburbs.
2. 	Buying property generally costs more money than a buyer has, which both means they need to borrow and the relative impact of this decision is much larger than other financial decisions.
In a follow up of this post, I will share some calculations I use to judge if real estate is cheap or expensive. Before getting to those, however, it’s important to disaggregate the moving pieces in real estate. 
The Moving Pieces
1. 	The price of a house or an apartment, like anything else, is determined by supply and demand, both of which fluctuate. A property can be further sub-divided into the physical structure and the land itself.
2. 	In the aggregate, real estate tends to rise in value over time, mostly due to inflation.
3. 	In the specific, however, real estate prices are very much contingent on local conditions in which there is enormous variation. You’ve probably experienced moments where something statistically unlikely occurred to you. For instance, as a teenager, I almost froze to death on a camping trip in the second worst storm West Virginia recorded.   Freak storms happen in real estate, too (like a pandemic).
4. 	In addition to real estate price fluctuations, an investor is exposed to the following, all of which are unstable:
Income. That is what you will use to pay off the debt. Income is unstable, while the debt is not.
Debt relative to your other assets.
Borrowing costs, which fluctuate.
Liquidity. It is possible to be “rich” with real estate but “poor” in terms of cash.
5. If you buy with debt, you are locked into a series of transactions. If your job is fine and real estate prices gradually climb, all is well.  If these variables start to work against you, pain can spiral. Imagine a stock market crash (your assets fall), that leads to your layoff (your income falls) and hurts appetite for real estate, your house price falls. Boom, you are in a snow-storm.
History and the Future
The typical advice to novice stock market investors is to buy an index, like the S&P 500, because betting on an individual stock (which also has a lot of moving pieces) is way too hard. With real estate, that’s not possible for the typical investor. You have just one house or apartment.Anticipating shifts in housing supply and demand is tough.   The classic example of this is Japan. They experienced a massive real estate bubble in the 1990s and thirty years later … houses are still under water as the chart from Rose shows (thank you, Rose!).

A less well known but even more compelling example is the US. As Yale University’s Robert Shiller points out, from 1890 to 1990 the real (inflation adjusted) prices of US houses … fell. Cars allowed people to move to the suburbs and home construction became more efficient. In other words, supply increased so prices fell.

Note that since then, however, US housing prices have shot up in real terms. There are two reasons. As real interest rates have declined everything has gone up. And in the pandemic, many scrambled for housing.
Yet this might not last, both because the central bank (the Fed) will reduce the amount of money circulating and, as the virus ebbs, remote work has freed us from tying our residence to our work. Why endure bad weather if you can hopscotch elsewhere?  If you have kids in schools, this is impossible. But for everyone else? There is now a vast real estate arbitrage of moving to places with decent weather but bad employment and cheaper real estate. No one knows exactly where this will net out. It’s also worth noting that politics can radically shift prices. There was a booming commerical real estate market in … Latvia. Then came the Nazis, followed by the Soviets. Not good for real estate.
What Isn’t Captured in Numbers
To be sure, housing has its advantages. Having a mortgage forces you to save. Owning property anchors us to a community. I am reminded of Eudora Welty’s story Death of a Traveling Salesman. On his death bed, he realizes he never put down roots. Many families have priceless memories tied to their modest summer cabin on a lake. Real estate can also help you hedge against inflation (as long as local supply does not increase) and in certain countries, like the US, there are tax advantages to owning.
Yet, financial analysis shows most Americans who own a house now would have been better off renting and putting money in the stock market, as the chart below shows, in part due of course to the fact that stocks have gone up so much.

Jim Comey – Watching the Train Leave the Station

On my best days, I look at others with curiosity. I like to try to imagine their motivations, even if that person does things differently than I would. At the end of day, we each render a judgement, but I try to go there only after imagining what the other person’s shoes feel like. Nothing new in that wisdom, but a struggle to consistently apply.
When I told acquaintances Jim was kind enough to appear on the podcast, I got a range of reactions. (You can listen to our conversation on Spotify here (or find it on Apple Podcasts). A number of people said, “oh, he is controversial.” That’s true. Some liberals think he gave us Trump and some on the right-wing fringe think he is part of a deep state. His story is interesting enough that Showtime made a series about it, which is now on Netflix.
Jim and I briefly crossed paths at my previous employer. We worked in different departments but management meetings were taped and shared, which is where I first saw and heard him. I listened for about a minute and said to myself “this guy is cut from a different cloth” and reached out. As I recall, our first exchange was about a book on Constitutional Law!
I then watched, like many of you, what happened next. He was appointed head of the FBI, which seemed in many ways a dream job for him, a better fit than corporate. His awareness of the battle between good and evil, truth and falsehood, was both inculcated at a young age, reinforced as a teenager when he and his brother were held at gun point and further honed when he worked as US Attorney against mob bosses, something he discusses in his most recent book Saving Justice.
In our conversation, I purposely did not ask about the things that he has already discussed, like what he thinks of Trump. Instead, I wanted to get a sense of his background, the balance we all face between ego and humility, what lessons he has drawn from his experience and other topics. I took away a few lessons.
It all begins when we are young. In Jim’s case, he grew up with a very strong moral compass.
The truth is both difficult to ascertain but also the fundamental force from which other sources of power flow—scientific inquiry, productivity, functional government.
Assume most people either aren’t forthright or aren’t aware of their own flaws.
I’ll be interested to hear what lessons you draw. Enjoy.
-Paul and the rest of the Still Press team.

Follow the Money

People who make good decisions rely on good frameworks. The doctor doesn’t diagnose randomly, symptoms are matched to a rubric. The framework behind these posts is this—follow the money.  In a later post, I’ll share the frameworks behind the podcasts.
We are all incarcerated in a money cage. Money exerts power on our lives whether we acknowledge it or not. Openly talking about money can make us feel vulnerable. At the same time, money talk can sometimes be terribly boring. It’s a paradox.
Yet, learning how to follow the money, to see how the cage is engineered, is powerful. It also deepens other perspectives, like psychology and history. I want to teach you how to read the newspaper backward. What do I mean?
Money is relegated to a separate section, Business. But the best way to understand the Front Page is to start with understanding the Business Page.  The economy generally drives politics, not the other way around.  The roots of Trumpism are flat wages. Inflation (more on this below) may do in Biden.
I stumbled on this approach. After college, I wanted to become a writer and figured living abroad might help.  In my roach infested apartment overlooking Moscow’s ring road, I quickly found my education didn’t equip me to understand what I was seeing, like coups, hyper-inflation, corruption and an explosion of entrepreneurialism.
What was going on? In the Soviet Union, very basic things didn’t work, like toilet paper. In the US, commercially viable toilet paper became available in 1857. The Soviet Union, a country with some of the biggest forests in the world, could not reliably produce and distribute it.  
The explanation for the toilet paper deficit was not to be had in Tolstoy, Russian language or international relations, though these are all interesting. The easiest explanation was that the Kremlin had the wrong price on toilet paper. It was that simple. The price did not incentivize the right action. With that realization, I decided to force myself to learn how money worked, even if I was bad at math and couldn’t (yet) see how money related to being a writer.
As I learned more about money, however, I noticed certain benefits. When I had a bad consumer experience, for instance, I knew exactly who to go to exert pressure (hint: not customer service). Learning to invest was even more transformative. I could express the picture of the world not only in an essay, but it in a series of investments. If the investments made money, I had the right picture and if they lost, I learned. The feedback for bad decisions was swift and merciless, which accelerated learning.  
I am still in the money cage, just like all of you, striving to improve my understanding of the architecture and hoping, through these posts, to share that understanding. The posts come from a mental architectural drawing of how money flows through our bank accounts and the economy. The below is the foundation, with links to relevant posts embedded. Over time, I will further develop this on my website paulpodolsky.com.
Money begins with printing. No one has ever figured out exactly how much money to create.
Printed money shows up in the economy and in financial markets. The economy is spending. Too much money in the economy is inflation.
If you earn money, you are often dependent on a corporation, which is unstable.
If you have excess money, you save. This money can go into stocks and bonds, or real estate.
If you save enough, you can stop working.
Global wealth shifts are ancient and lead to conflict, which is very expensive.
The US is trying to preserve its global position but doing so from a weaker financial position.
More Recently:
Last week, the US government issued a report showing prices are rising quickly relative to history. If you look at the wages of people who get paid by the hour, they are beginning to contract if you measure them after inflation. This is a big deal. This means the truck driver or roofer is seeing the dollars in their paycheck increase and what they can buy in the store decrease, as the chart below from Rose shows. If you wonder what would crush Democrats in mid-term elections, this might be it.

Money Bad

Vladimir Putin wants respect. He might feel he needs to invade Ukraine get it, which is why you are seeing stories about Russian troops massing on Ukraine’s border. Unpredictability may be useful in geopolitics, but it is terrible for investment. The poor long-term return on Russian stocks is a case study in a) how disappointing emerging market or “EM” investing has been1 and b) why rule of law and wealth are related.
My Early Lesson
The term “emerging markets,” or EM, was coined in 1981 by Antoine van Agtmael at the World Bank. China had recently emerged from Maoism.  The hope was that foreign investors could earn attractive returns by directing their savings to EM entrepreneurs hungry for capital. The Berlin Wall fell eight years later.
The reality was something else, as I saw first hand. In 1997, I was invited to a series of meetings with Mikhail Khodorkovsky, then worth $15 billion and Russia’s richest man. Like most billionaires, he held a high opinion of himself. Putin became President in 2000 and Khodorkovsky dared to criticize the Kremlin. He was arrested in 2003, charged with fraud and served 10 years. I saw grim pictures of him behind bars and could barely believe it was the same guy. Wealth is always unstable, particularly in EM.
There is a Russian saying that “the severity of our laws is compensated by the rarity of their enforcement.” In many EM countries, the rules are fluid and often unwritten, which means everyone can be prosecuted if the government choses to do so. Jack Ma, once China’s richest man, was dethroned after criticizing the government, just like Khodorkovsky (though Ma did not go to prison).  It is hard enough to make money investing with relatively predictable politics.
The Case at Hand
Today, if you lend a dollar to the US government for ten-years you earn 1.6%. Russia gives you 8.3%. This pricing is matched asset by asset. A share of JP Morgan is more expensive and pays a much lower dividend than the Russian equivalent, Sberbank.  Why?
The geeky answer is the market is pricing in a substantial decline in the Russian ruble.2 (This is an issue finance experts talk about a lot, but I have relegated it to a footnote because I think most readers don’t want that level of detail). The conceptual answer is the market is pricing a system that is medieval. By medieval I mean a system ruled by a King, where palace rivals are poisoned, and borders are determined by relative military advantage.   It’s like Shakespeare, but with the internet and nuclear weapons.
There are lots of places with disputed borders like the one between Russia and Ukraine. If one country begins to forcibly shift a border, others will want the same, opening up potential chaos.  In July, Putin published an essay called “On the Historical Unity of Russians and Ukrainians.” Much of the essay is abstruse (“…it ended with the Truce of Andrusovo in 1667”). Putin claims Ukraine and Russia are “essentially the same historical and spiritual place.” If that’s what he thinks, then the border, which the Ukrainians are defending to the death, might not matter much to Putin.
Putin might not to invade. If he doesn’t invade, Russian assets probably go up. Invading is expensive, will be unpopular if Russian soldiers start dying and jeopardizes a natural gas pipeline deal Russia is trying to close with Germany.    At the same time, Putin believes the US is weak, particularly after Afghanistan.  The answer is unknowable, which is why investors are stepping away. This same type of dynamic has unfolded again and again, both in Russia and other EMs.
Investors often get wiped out via the currency. If you own Russian stocks and the Russian ruble falls, your own wealth, measured in dollars, falls. The Russian ruble has yet to recover from the invasion of Crimea … seven years ago. (Though the actual return of investors looks a bit better again due to the geeky math in the footnote). The chart below showing Russian GDP measured in US dollar’s, with a comparison to a neighbor, Poland. Said differently, Russian GDP would be $2.4 trillion higher if they had not invaded.3

A 30 Year Underperformance … or a US Bubble?
By all classic measures, the ruble is undervalued. Many other EM currencies also look “cheap.”  Yet, if Russia invades Ukraine, the ruble will become even more undervalued as foreign investors back away and domestic investors panic. While Russian stocks have earned solid returns over the last few years, they are extremely volatile, which means investors can not hold many of them in their portfolio without their performance becoming disproportionate.
The chart below from Rose is both a wall of numbers and critical for any finance geek. It shows the return and risk of emerging market assets. Divide one (return) by the other (risk) and you get the ratio which is like the miles per gallon for an investment. What is shows is that the miles per gallon for Russian assets are low, largely because the volatility is so high. In part, this is because Russia’s oil-dependent economy is very volatile but it is also likely because of political risk.

To be sure, not all emerging markets countries are not the same. Brazil and India are what The Economist Intelligence Unit labels flawed democracies, like the US. China and Russia are authoritarian. Russia and Brazil export commodities, China and India import them. It’s also worth noting that US is becoming more unstable, which The Economist ratings show. The fact that emerging markets are disappointing and the US is both expensive and increasingly unstable perhaps explains the why some (not me) are enthralled with bitcoin and Ethereum.  
I’ll share my asset allocation with subscribers next month. I hold less EM now than I did at the beginning of the year and have tilted more into places I’d once avoided, like Europe and Japan. My experience in Russia, including the most recent one, helps explain why.  I’m also now more interested in countries on the periphery like Canada, Australia, Norway and Sweden. As I’ve said many times, wealth is unstable and you need to be attentive to both earn it and hold on to it.

If anything I wrote is unclear, write me at paul@paulpodolsky.com. For more access, become a subscriber or a sponsor. On Wednesday, we (the Still Press team) release our next podcast, a conversation with Tamara Chubinidze, the founder and owner of the Georgian resteraunt Chama Mama. We’ve had guests on from Russia, China and France and I’d like to continue to pull in stories from around the world. Her’s is a fascinating one.
1
The shorter-term (5 year) return on Russian assets has been pretty good.
2
The ruble is discounted to decline about 75% over the next 10 years. The forward price of the ruble is a function of the local interest rate, 7.5%, relative to the US interest rate, roughly 0, meaning the ruble is discounted to fall 7.5% over the next 12 months. The interest rate pricing (which drives this forward discounted rate) is about the same at 10 years. This means if the ruble only falls 10% over the next 10 years, an investor would make 60%. While Russian assets have underperformed over the long-term they have outperformed on a shorter-term (5 year) basis, in part due to a compression of risk premiums after the invasion.
3
This is a bit of an oversimplification, a more thorough discussion is here. The ruble decline coincided with a collapse in oil (Russia’s main export) and teasing out what exactly drove what is complex.
Inside a Georgian Kitchen (Take #2)

Separately, one reader questioned numbers in Sunday’s post Money Bad. The reader’s perspective was the return of Russian stocks since 2015 have been “humongous,” as the reader wrote. I cherish this type of feedback because it pushes both me and my partners at Rose to dig deeper. We went back and looked at the data again and below is a more granular picture of the relative return of US and emerging market stocks. These calculations are useful and not precise1. What looks like a wall of numbers matters a lot to finance nerds and investors.
What you can see based on Rose’s work is, yes, Russian stocks have done well recently BUT they are quite volatile, so volatile the return an investor gets for the risk they take is low compared not only to the US but many emerging markets. This return per unit risk (what’s labeled as a Sharp ratio) is a measure of an investment’s efficiency that is sort of like miles per gallon for a car. This doesn’t mean you can’t hold Russian or other EM stocks. It does mean though that you can’t prudently hold many of them and factually, over the long-term, the returns of a broad index have been poor.

Part of this volatility is due to the nature of Russia’s economy, which is highly dependent on a volatile source of income, oil. But part of it is likely because political risk rattles both domestic and foreign investors. This will not be picked up by looking at flows because you can’t measure an event that did not occur. Certainly the possibility of invading Ukraine doesn’t help.
Volatility exacts a significant toll on growing wealth. The classic example is having a $100 portfolio and losing 50%. Once your capital has shrunk you need a 100% return on the remaining $50 (ignoring compounding) to get back to where you started.
Other notes:
I will not be publishing Sunday, nor around the holidays in late December.
Lastly, I am raising prices to be closer to market and also to help drive investments in data and staff to make these even better. I had hoped to provide a warning on the price change but these calculations (above) took so long I ran out the clock. If there are students or others among you for whom the new price is an issue, reach out to me.
For those of you in the US, happy Thanksgiving. To the rest of you, we love our global audience. To all, we so much appreciate your support and interest in our venture.

Will the US System Snap?

The US system is under stress from both within and without.  Because the US is the center of the global financial system, with the biggest economy and the deepest financial markets, this matters to anyone saving money. Will the US system endure the stress or, like Germany in the 1930s, snap?
For investors, this question is playing out alongside:
1.     A technology driven boom that is improving living standards (like mRNA vaccines) and simultaneously rapidly disrupting cash flows, businesses and perhaps your job.
2.     A pandemic that has killed 7 to 10 million people (based on excess mortality)1,  disrupted production, boosted inflation and created a psychological shock such that we are now primed for bad news.
3.     Waning government stimulation. The US central bank is beginning to very modestly slow the rate at which they are printing money, what is called “tapering.” This reduces the amount of money going into the economy and financial markets.
The question is how to invest to position for the good (growth, innovation and disruption) while recognizing the bad outcomes can be really bad. How much the central bank tightens is important but not fundamental. That large numbers2 of Americans believe the last Presidential election was fraudulent is fundamental. Could a disputed US election lead to widespread violence?  Will perceived US weakness lead to war in Ukraine or Taiwan?
At the root, the stress is around the relative resilience of an open (more democratic) versus a closed (ruled by “enlightened” elites) system.  Because I am rooting for the open system, it’s hard to be objective. Our own ability to self-deceive is high. Also, a system is dynamic, in the same way a financial market is.
Feedback Loops
We can’t be objective about a financial market because we participate in them. Markets are people, us. Nations are the same. There are feedback mechanisms in each. BLM protests send a signal that generates a response. Likely fear of Trumpism helped pass the infrastructure spend bill. The speed of this feedback loop is critical. The gap between slavery being abolished and the 1964 Civil Rights Act was … a century.  
Covid is a case study in a closed versus open system. Initially, China’s lock-down response was much more effective than the de-centralized Western response. The feedback response was better. After an appalling number of deaths, an open system with private sector companies richly compensated to produce peer-reviewed studies developed amazing vaccines with closer to 95% efficacy. By contrast, Chinese vaccine efficacy is closer to 60%3 (which, to be clear, is much better than no vaccine). Short-term, the Chinese response saved thousands of lives and I’d prefer the Moderna vaccine.
Goals and Measurement
One of the beautiful things about investing is that results provide an objective measure of the quality of an idea. The best investors get around 40% of their decisions wrong so there is plenty of grist for reflection.  Your goals determine what you measure.
In investing, the goal is to get the highest return possible for the least amount of risk. In terms of government, the goal is life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness. The US, Russian and Chinese Constitutions have much in common. “Citizens of the People’s Republic of China shall enjoy freedom of speech, the press….” Russia’s Constitution echoes this.4  Trump supporters storming the Capital saw themselves as patriots. The question is less what the goals are than in how to achieve them. With the help of Rose Technology, I tried to measure how we are doing.
Life
Open systems are good for life expectancy. Revolutions, be they Maoism or the collapse of the Soviet Union, are bad. Note how low life expectancy was in China in 1960.
The US has higher rates of violence than China, as seen below. Poor people in the US experience a disproportionate amount of this violence.5 Russia stands out as having both poor civil liberties and high rates of violence.  Both Latin America and Africa have appalling violence.

Liberty
Disputed elections, gerrymandering and corruption all contribute to falling US scores. In China and Russia, term limits on the Supreme Leader have been abandoned, a problem the US was trying to solve in the 18th century.
Another perspective on liberty is migration. I showed this before. People want a better life and they will go great distances to get it. In this sense, the ability to generate wealth is critical for political stability and being open seems to help with that.

Pursuit of Happiness
Over time, the US has been a wealth creation miracle. Since the collapse of the Soviet Union, China has been a miracle. Russia initially did very well under Putin (in part due to an oil boom), but wealth has since stagnated.

Given this, why has a segment of Americans lost faith in the system? Likely disruptive economic change is a factor. It’s better to be a disruptor than disrupted. The disruptors are tech and the people that invest in and support tech. To be in the top 1%, you need assets of more than $10 million.

Debates about how open or closed a society should be are ancient. Breakdowns in opens societies are terrible for wealth. So far, the US is bruised but intact but that we are having this discussion should give you pause. Later this month, I’ll share my asset allocation with subscribers.

Wins and Losses

Looking back, the best way to invest is always obvious. Looking forward, the best path is always uncertain, probabilistic. That’s the nature of investing. This year, I earned a low double-digit return.1 Given almost 7% inflation, that means I modestly grew the value of my savings in real (inflation-adjusted) terms.  Here is how that happened.
What helped:
1. 	Owning stocks, particularly banks and commodity producers. The S&P 500 rose by over 20%. Some bank stocks I owned, like Wells Fargo, rose by almost 60%. I thought the economy would get better and financial firms and raw material producers would do particularly well in such a scenario.
2. 	Selling US bonds (betting prices would fall) in the first-quarter. I thought as the economy strengthened and inflation rose, bond prices would fall.
3.    Owning certain commodities, like copper, which rose over 20%, amid a shift toward more environmentally friendly energy production, which requires a lot of copper.
4.    Lending money to distressed borrowers. Early in the pandemic, there was a lot disruption and borrowers were forced to accede to terms favorable to lenders. As conditions stabilized, distress eased and prices rose.
What hurt:
1. 	Selling bonds after April. After declining in the first part of the year, bond prices stopped falling, even as inflation rose. The link between higher inflation and higher bond yields broke down.
2. 	Owning Chinese stocks. Chinese stocks lost about 5% as Beijing cracked down on entrepreneurs and entire sectors, like education. Certain popular stocks, like Alibaba, fell 40%. I had thought Xi was anti-civil liberties but pro-capitalism.
3. 	Emerging market bonds. I thought money printing in the US and high interest rates in emerging markets would favor emerging market bonds. Instead, bond prices in places like Russia fell, in part as Putin stationed troops on Ukraine’s border.
4. 	Owning gold, which lost about 5% this year in part because investors moved into crypto instead.
Essentially, some of the things I did to protect against rising inflation (like selling bonds and buying gold) didn’t work. I also took too little risk. After tracking my investment returns for years, I know I generally (but not always) make money. Yet, I’ve seen so many once-famous investors get wiped out because of hubris that I’ve always worried about my own hubris.
Looking Forward
The economy is strong and there are a lot of exciting, productivity-enhancing technological changes afoot (like mRNA vaccines). This is good for asset prices. Yet, the pandemic means:
tens of thousands more (only 16% of Americans have a booster!) likely deaths,2
inflationary production and distribution disruptions and
central bank printing less money (tightening) to combat this inflation.
Tightening is bad for assets. The challenge is basically how to own the good and protect against the bad. A key question is guessing how much the central bank tightens. I know this sound technical. Trust me, this really matters.
The price of an asset—a house, a stock, a bond—is set by supply and demand.  Demand comes from many sources, but the biggest source of demand is, ultimately, the central bank for the simple reason that they have unlimited resources. The central bank creates zeros on a computer and money flows into the economy and assets. For a person like you or me to buy an asset, we need to earn money, which is much harder and can only shift so much. An individual can also borrow money, but ultimately that is paid back with income.
What Are Reasonable Expectations?
Markets are expectations.  The price of Apple stock today incorporates expectations for how many iPhones they sell in coming years. For a price to change, there needs to be a shift in activity relative to expectations. The price of suburban houses rose after Covid because there was an unexpected shift in demand as buyers fled cities.
The central bank (the Fed) has gone from saying inflation isn’t a big deal, to saying it is. That happened in a few weeks. Is it possible they will soon say inflation is a BIG deal? Maybe. Expectations about their policy translates into numbers.  If I lend the government money for two-years, I earn 0.65%. This interest rate is priced to rise to 1.5% in two years.3 If the central bank raises interest rates faster than what they are now expected to do, this process will suck money out of markets, like stocks.
This graphic created for me by DGFX Studios capture the idea pretty well.

It’s a matter of degree. Below (courtesy of Rose Technology) shows previous times the central bank has acted. History is a guide but is not predictive. I worry what we face may be worse than what has occurred in decades, because both stocks and bonds may loose value at the same time.4

How Big of a Hedge?
I have around 40% of my money in the stock market. Half that is outside the U.S., where similar stocks are not as expensive.   In response to the risks described, I have significantly shifted my bets, as you can see below, selling bonds that should decline in price if the central bank tightens more than what they are currently expected to do.

It’s a tricky because I am guessing what the central bank will do months from now. Between now and then we will get more information about Covid and inflation. The central bank will only make a decision after this information is received, while as an investor I need to make a decision before. I suspect that because we are in a new wave of Covid, the interruptions that have caused inflation to rise will persist and that this will force the Fed to act faster than they are expected to. Given that real (inflation adjusted) interest rates are deeply negative, moving them higher may cause losses in stock, bond and commodity markets, pain I am trying to mitigate. This isn’t certain, but it’s a risk, a risk big enough in my mind to justify the shifts I made.
1
These are NOT audited returns. I am keeping track on a spreadsheet, nothing more. Investment carries risk of loss. This is not investment advice. You can and will lose money investing, it is the nature of the game.
2
https://www.cdc.gov/coronavirus/2019-ncov/science/forecasting/forecasting-us.html. Also, https://www.nytimes.com/2021/12/18/us/omicron-booster-shots-americans.html
3
This is based on forward interest rate pricing, which is a technical topic that would require another essay. Suffice to say, these forward prices are not an opinion poll, it is the physics of how money is priced.
4
Note that these are TOTAL returns. If you strip out the cash rate, these results look worse, suggesting the risk of negative returns is even higher given that current cash rates are zero.

The Stories We Tell

We are wired for story. Stories can be conveyed in a cave painting, from the pulpit, a book or a podcast. Story is the way we share meaning and truth. Today’s post is about key lessons that emerged from Season #3 of the Things I Didn’t Learn in School podcast.
Our eight guests came from a range of backgrounds. As a reminder, they were: Adam Frankel, an Obama speechwriter; Rabbi Michael Friedman; Dr. Alexander Vanyukov, a Russian surgeon who re-purposed to treat Covid; Ray Dalio, an investor and author; Dan Zwirn, also an investor; Jim Comey, former head of the FBI; Tamara Chubinidze, a restauranteur and Nick Reber, a health-data entrepreneur. These stories were downloaded from Ho Chi Minh to Singapore to Kiev to Toronto to New York City.
While stories are infinite, the ones we remember often follow a structure. There is a beginning a middle and an end, of course. There is also a discernible pattern within those three parts.  
Classically, the story begins with an event that knocks the main character out of the familiar. Think Odysseus released from captivity or Darth Vader capturing Princess Leia. This disruption forces the main character to respond, often against difficult opponents. Characters like Atticus Finch in To Kill Mockingbird or Jason Bourne come to mind. The hero digs deep and in doing so comes to see that they must rely on others, like Sancho Panza helping Don Quixote or Hermione aiding Harry Potter. Finally, the disruption is resolved and the main character is transformed, often wiser and more humble, like Raskolnikov confessing to murder in Crime and Punishment or Dorothy tapping the heels of her ruby slippers in The Wizard of Oz and waking up.
While life is messier than fiction, I saw the above rubric at work in our Season #3 conversations.
Lesson #1 – Expect your life to be disrupted.
Some of these disruptions are widely shared, like leaving home, becoming a parent or switching jobs. Others are more specific. Dr. Vanyukov’s life went from being a heart surgeon with a relatively predictable work schedule to navigating Covid in a country where trust in government and vaccines is low. Investor Ray Dalio suffered every parent’s worse nightmare, the loss of a child. Investor Dan Zwirn was suspected of having committed a terrible mistake, and only got cleared…years later. Jim Comey crossed paths with Trump.
In their own words:
“The bus can come up on the sidewalk and hit you.” –Dan.
 “Life is going to come at you. And it will give you wonderful things and it will give you terrible things in its way. And that’s just..life.” –Ray.
We also create disruption, like the way Nick is disrupting health care. I find it useful to sometimes stop thinking about whatever challenges I face and instead remember that everyone around me is dealing with their own disruptions. While disruption can feel isolating, it is a shared experience.
Lesson #2 – Our power comes from choosing how to respond.
This is an old idea.
In their own words:
            “Choosing your attitude, you’re choosing your energy …you have to know you have a choice fighting the battle,” Tamara.
            “Reputations are not under your control, only character is,” Dan.
Reinhold Niebuhr offered the serenity prayer. God, grant me the serenity to accept the things I cannot change, courage to change the things I can, and the wisdom to know the difference.
Lesson #3 – People want to help.
Big problems are…big, too big for any single person to solve.  We require aid and cooperation, which of course requires compromise and flexibility.
In their own words:
“If you need help, just ask. And that help can come from the most unexpected people and places. I couldn’t even imagine that erstwhile soccer hooligans would be willing to run around helping grandmas,” Dr. Vanyukov.
Tamara’s help came in the form of tapping generations of culinary wisdom in her own family. “I was growing up in like a food competition, from two different regions,” in Georgia, she said. 
In his teenage years, Rabbi Michael Friedman decided “Judaism could be a guide … for how to live a good life.”
Lesson #4 – You will get through your challenges and this will change you.
In their own words:
“Truly honest people are very, very rare. That is honest about themselves, about their biases, about facts,” Jim. 
The stories are there, if we ask and listen. Of course, if you are doing the telling, learn to “keep it simple and short; nobody ever wished a speech was longer,” as Adam said.
Happy Holidays from the Still Press Team! Also, if you have someone who you think would make a great podcast guest, reach out.

The Barbell As Medicine

Happy New Year!
The most likely New Year’s resolution is some combo of get-in-shape and lose weight; worship of a sculpted physique is at least as old as ancient Greece. That’s why I thought a special treat would be a season #3 New Year’s Day encore podcast, the link is here, with Matt Reynolds, CEO and founder of Barbell Logic. Matt’s story is both about how to get stronger and how a phone can disrupt an industry.
Given the word “barbell” is in his company’s name, it’s perhaps unsurprising that Matt can lift very heavy things. For a while, he made a name for himself tugging trucks with his teeth, a link to body building’s vaudeville roots.  At that time, he was working as a teacher. Lifting was a hobby that, in his words, seemed “niche.”
Then Matt got the idea he could share his understanding with regular folk. Matt began “proselytizing the value of strength as a quality-of-life improvement.” You can see a video of Matt talking here. In our conversation, he tells the story of an elderly woman who could not easily get out of a chair when he met her but was slowly transformed by lifting, regaining functions she had thought were permanently lost.  Hearing Matt’s story made me want to lift heavy things, too.
There is an economic angle to Matt’s story as well. There are roughly 340,000 personal trainers in the US. That’s about three trainers for each of the U.S’s 100,000 gyms. By definition, most of these trainers are mediocre, average. Matt’s business is aimed at connecting clients with great trainers, giving coaches something they once lacked: scale. You film your lifting session and send it to your coach. Each of you can be anywhere.
Disruptions create new disruptions. An iPhone was the pre-condition not only for Waze but Matt’s company. While the trade of what economists call “goods” (think factories) got disrupted decades ago, the services industry (like coaching) is only now getting going. Matt’s company was founded in 2016. How many of those 340,000 trainers do we need if Matt’s business does well?  How many of the services—education, tax preparation, legal– can be offered for less cost and higher quality remotely?
Education is a biggie. There are certain foundational building blocks to social cohesion–a shared alphabet, religion, news source and curriculum. These institutions are all resistant to change, but under enough pressure, they give way. Yet, the core of my children’s public education wasn’t that different from what I experienced in the 1970s. To date, education hasn’t been meaningfully disrupted.
Disruption occurs at the edges at first. You fire the local trainer and hire Matt. You skip after-school tutoring and do it yourself (better, cheaper) with Khan Academy. Bigger changes are likely afoot. Higher education, particularly the most expensive institutions, look like juicy targets. As always, something is lost, and something is gained.
Living through this much change is exciting and disorienting. The disorientation is big enough that I want to write a follow-up post on the topic more broadly. I’m also going to host an “ask me anything” for subscribers to get a better sense of what’s on your mind. (Subscribers have already asked me to write an update on China and energy markets).
For today, however, revel that we all made it into another year. Also, we will not be publishing next week, spending the time instead lining up guests for season #4 of the podcast. Thanks as always for your support and interest.
Happy New Year from me and the rest of the Still Press team.
Jail Break

The tricky thing about investing is there are no fixed truths. There is common sense—buy low, sell high—but the game shifts because we shift. The market is people and our attitudes toward saving evolve, particularly after ruptures like depressions, wars and pandemics. This is evident in the “big quit;” millions of people suddenly leaving their salaried jobs, myself among them.
When I took this decision, I made some calculations. I will share them here, call it the cost of breaking free.  Knowing these calculations shifts money from something emotional and mystical to something quite simple, like tracking calories.
My calculations differ from those of a typical Wall Street shop. Their calculations assume good things will happen, like that the stock market will rise. As a result of this assumption, they say you can spend down 4% of your savings every year.  While it’s true that on average stock markets rise, it’s also true that they go through decade plus periods when they don’t and such a period could easily overlap with the time when you try to jail break. Don’t make optimistic assumptions, instead assume things will go badly and be pleasantly surprised if they don’t.
Here are the steps, along with a table and a calculator to let you do this yourself.
Step #1
The first calculation is the Steve Jobs calculation, which is the “knowing I will be dead soon,” as he described in his Stanford commencement speech. How soon? Find out.
I used the US social security administration actuarial tables, which suggest those of us in the US will generally be dead by age 85. By this measure, I have about 370 months left to live. Of course, there is a wide band around that mid-point. I put that band under the category or refinements (more on that below).  
I suspect the pandemic forced people to consider their own mortality.  Perhaps it also showed an alternative way of living. Many of you probably have some dream. Maybe it is starting a company or living in Italy or running for office or starting a family. If it’s holding the salaried job you hold, fine. If it isn’t, apply the Steve Jobs test. 
Step #2
Know your run-rate, how much money you spend each month. You can drive yourself crazy trying to figure out this number. Don’t. A very rough estimate will do.
The big thing you spend money on is the obvious stuff, like taxes, insurance, shelter, food, etc. Each month track roughly what you spend. Write it down. Average this over a few months and you roughly know your run rate. You can also ask others how much they spend.
Recognize this is what you spend after taxes. The typical US family spends $5000 a month. To keep it simple, round up and assume they spend $100k year or a bit more than $8000 a month. That means they’d need about $130k a year pre-tax. The more they spend the higher the tax bracket and vice versa.  Just like you want to under-estimate investment returns you want to over-estimate your spending.
The lower this run-rate, the easier it is to break free. That said, you need to make BIG changes to make a difference. Switching from a latte to a black coffee won’t move the needle. Moving from New England to Mexico, avoiding addiction or a messy divorce will. 
Step #3
Multiply months left to live times your expenses. Take the $100k a year spending person with 370 months as an example. They need about $3.5 million saved to break free. Adjust this number down for money already saved and up for debt owed.
If these calculations seem simple, people aren’t doing them. The typical US family has about $100k in savings. This is in part because in the US there is not forced savings, a contrast to an Australia where there is. I think asking the average American to figure this out is quite a stretch. Maybe this essay can help.
A sample table looks like this.

Here is a calculator you can play around with this yourself, one in Google sheets (thanks my friends at Rose!) and one in excel.
Google sheets:
https://www.dropbox.com/s/81ncrbsiazfokbn/cost.of.jailbreak.calculator.v2.xlsx?dl=0
Excel:
https://www.dropbox.com/s/81ncrbsiazfokbn/cost.of.jailbreak.calculator.v2.xlsx?dl=0
To make the analysis more precise you can:
a) 	Adjust the lifespan, i.e. if you don’t smoke you live longer.
b)	Adjust income. How profitable will your break free occupation be? I assumed I’d earn zero. Too pessimistic?
c) 	Adjust inflation. This is a biggie. To be more accurate, assume expenses grow by the rate of inflation. That will make this analysis look even worse. Inflation is discounted to be about 2.5% a year over the next 10 years.
d)	Assume asset growth. Asset prices do indeed rise over time, on average. This would make this analysis look better but given 7% current inflation, they need to rise a lot.
e)	Include social security and Medicare. In the US, once these kick in, expenses fall.
f) Jail break without the cushion, recognizing that you are taking a bigger risk.
Other:
Market views:
Since I’ve started this newsletter, I’ve made three big decisions: avoid bitcoin, sell bonds and buy stocks.  Since the time I shared those decisions in print, bitcoin is down 25%, bonds have lost about 4% and the S&P is up 22%. These essays are not investment advice; I am sharing with subscribers what I do, when I do it. I am moving around my portfolio more and will update that for subscribers later this quarter.
What I’m reading:
Non-fiction: Unique, the New Science of Human Individuality, by David Linden and Morality, by Jonathan Sachs. David published an essay in the Atlantic that struck me.  “It is possible, even easy, to occupy two seemingly contradictory mental states at the same time.” Agreed.
Sachs argued the foundation of “civil society,” the sphere independent of politics and business, was anchored by a Judeo-Christian moral framework that believed in absolute, not relative truth. He argued that as this code weakened, society became more fragile.
Fiction: The Age of Innocence, Edith Wharton; Les Misérables, Victor Hugo. These are old classics and remind me both how much and how little things have changed. One of Hugo’s characters says that the important question is “how to create wealth and how to distribute it.” Many nations are having that same debate now. That’s evidence in the US and also China’s “common prosperity” push.
It is minus 9 outside today…time to go for a ski. Talk to you next week. Write with questions…I can arrange calls with subscribers.

The Tide Goes Out
If the rest of 2022 looks like January, most savers are in for some pain. Asset prices (stock indexes and bonds) are down and inflation is up. In real terms (after inflation), the typical saver has a lot less money, like about 8% less just this month. If this continues for the next six months … that is a meaningful decline in real wealth.
Here is an abbreviated version of what is going on:
1. 	The central bank (the Fed) is slowing the rate at which they print money. Less printing = less demand for assets = lower prices.
2. 	Inflation is rising, due to a combination of strong demand and a disrupted supply chain. China, a critical node, is disrupted due to zero Covid tolerance and vaccines that don’t work well versus Omicron. Chinese ports may be impaired for years.  That suggests the US central bank might need to raise interest rates a lot to slow demand because supply will struggle for some time. Right now, the bond market is betting the Fed will lift rates 1% this year. If market expectations shift higher, stocks will fall further.
3. 	Russia may invade Ukraine, which, depending on exactly how they do this, may drive commodity prices up further. Russia supplies raw materials to the rest of the world. Much of what we call inflation is commodities.
4. 	The Biden Administration is floundering. Afghanistan + Covid + inflation = Republican sweep of November elections and an end to additional fiscal stimulus.
The question, as always, is what to do. I will share my specific asset allocation answer with subscribers later this quarter. I will also host an “ask me anything” (AMA for hipsters) for subscribers Sunday January 30, at 2 pm New York City time. I’ll send out a separate subscriber-only note the day before as a reminder and with call details.
Stocks
A stock has two moving parts, the earnings of the company an investor owns and the price paid for those earnings.1 The earnings of many, not all, companies are likely to grow over the next year. The problem is with the high price investors pay for those earnings.
A combination of zero interest rates and high inflation meant investors lost money holding cash, so many, particularly households, bought US stocks. The chart below from Yale Professor Robert Shiller shows one perspective on this. It exaggerates how bad things look2 but is still useful.  The average PE over the long term is around half what is on the chart, suggesting stocks are roughly 40% or 50% overvalued.

So an investor ought to sell, right? The answer is “it depends.” How big holdings of US stocks are relative to other assets held, age, where assets are held (taxable or not) all factor in. It’s certainly possible stocks fall a lot more. If I had all of my wealth in crypto and tech stocks (I don’t), I’d be concerned.
Taxes
While I’ve discussed asset allocation before here, I have not addressed taxes. In most of the world, savers are taxed twice. Many consider the first set of taxes, on income, but not the second set of taxes, on savings. I am not an accountant and this piece is neither investment nor tax advice,3 however, I will share my thoughts with you and you can decide what to do yourself.  In the US, there are different levels of what are called capital gains taxes, basically taxing your savings.  There are also taxes on dividends, which can be qualified (taxed like capital gains) or non-qualified (taxed higher, like income).  
The chart below shows the periods of time since 1970 when US stocks have lost money and a horizontal line at the highest level of capital gains, 20%.4 As you can see, there are four periods (1975, 1987, 2001 and 2008) where you would be better off selling, paying the tax and trying to invest later (if you can time it right). Another example is 1929. There are lots of times stocks fall and, factoring in taxes, it was a bad time to sell.

This is a function of compounding. If you benefited from a big run up in stock prices and you sell, you write a check to the government. This means you are now compounding off of a smaller base. If stocks bounce, you are bouncing with less money, which means you need a bigger bounce to get back where you started. (If you like these charts, thank Rose Technology, a start-up that is fantastic at visualizing economic data).
So the question is not are US stocks overvalued, they are. The question for taxable investors is are we on the edge of 20%+ correction? My answer is: maybe, but I’m not sure because the earnings (in aggregate) will be OK. There is a bigger question that I will address at a later time which is this: years of stimulative policy have driven asset prices so high that bringing them back to earth will depress spending.
I’ve taken steps to protect myself and will share them with subscribers. Step #1 was holding a small exposure to tech to begin with. Mine was about 3%. Many institutions have also avoided holding a lot of US stocks. Households, however, disagreed, and have driven the last two-years of rally. What will they do next?

Constraints
I want to provide a follow up to last week’s post, Jail Break. I realize, particularly for younger readers, the title is a bit disingenuous. In truth, you never break free; rather, you constantly negotiate constraints. That’s true in two basic life vectors, work and relationships.
Consider the relative merits of working for a big corporation or yourself. A corporation offers scale. Scale widens your circle by putting you in contact with new people, makes you part of something bigger. It also embeds you in a bureaucracy. Managing your boss, negotiating colleagues, budget and salary become the work, in addition to the actual work.  Tired, you leave (“jail break”) and start your own gig. Now you have to build an idea from scratch and there is no one to blame but yourself for the outcomes.
Relationships obey the same physics. Being monogamous creates constraints, dating (which I last did in the 1990s) creates different constraints.  Constraints are inescapable, chose them well. Life, as Chekhov said, is a vexatious trap!  

Russia and Ukraine – A number of readers asked me about this. In brief, if rule of law matters, Russia can not violate Ukraine’s borders. That’s the Western perspective. If rule of law is a mushy concept, what matters is power. If the US isn’t willing to put troops on the ground, Russia can seize territory. The gap between Russia and the West regarding rule of law began opening up in 1215 when the Magna Carta came into being and continues to this day. In terms of the markets, invading is terrible for Russian productivity. The cost of capital goes up and talent gradually leaks out. I spoke about this before here.

Reading and watching:
Watching: Passing. You can read about the film here. I don’t think this film could have been made 20 years ago. Our culture is in motion and great art moves the conversation forward. Soros, a documentary about the man, who I have met a few times. It captures him well.
Reading: Undermoney and a bit of Ulysses. Undermoney is a new word. As the author, Jay Newman, defines it, it is “money which is unknown publicly but that controls individuals and events.” It’s also the 100-year anniversary of James Joyce’s work. I’ve started but never finished the book and, in his honor, dipped my toe back in.
I thought about today’s post while walking here:

1
Put aside dividends, which are paid out of earnings.
2
Shiller is using a 10-year average of earnings…which means that if earnings have picked up over recent years, this measure will decline and look less scary. Investors often look at what earnings will be in the future, which would bring the PE down further.
3
Investing is RISKY. You can and will lose money.
4
If your income is less than $40K, you don’t pay capital gains; from $40 to $440k, you pay 15%; above $440k, you pay 20% (based on Google).
Tightening and War

There are times when it is easier to make money investing and times when it is harder; this is a time when it is harder. Investors (savers) need to simultaneously navigate a) less Fed money printing and b) a potential war—while not losing sight of the big picture, which is a transformative wave of innovation.
These forces can work in opposite directions. For instance:
a) 	Removing liquidity (tightening) hurts bonds, prices down, yields up (which is what has happened this year).
b)	Invasions fuel uncertainty, which drives bond prices up in places like the US.
c) 	Simultaneously removing liquidity and an invasion is bad for stocks (which are negative year-to-date).
d)	Tech innovation is good for stocks, particularly the companies doing the innovating—but a tech revolution is a longer-term trend that can be swamped by the short-term.
e)	Green investing aims to cut fossil fuel investment, war with a major energy supplier (Russia) encourages increasing non-Russia fossil fuel investment.
To make money, an investor needs to balance these forces just right, which is delicate work. I am sharing how I am navigating this, for you to take or leave. THIS LETTER IS NOT INVESTMENT ADVICE.1
Ukraine
Ukraine is really complicated. You could argue forever about what its borders should be, based on competing claims from Ukraine, Poland, Russia and others. Given that, claiming the current border isn’t a true border, which in essence is what Russia is claiming, creates utter chaos. There are potential border disputes all over the world. If you open up one border dispute, you risk opening up many, including, by the way, ones between Russia and the Kremlin’s ally, China.
Culturally, there is a nationalist resurgence afoot in Ukraine. When I was a reporter in Russia in the early 1990s, I went by bus from Russia to Ukraine. Almost everyone spoke Russian. Now Ukraine is linguistically split, more like a Canada (English, French) or Switzerland (French, Swiss-German, Italian). But in Ukraine the split has happened relatively quickly; it accelerated following Russia’s 2014 Crimea invasion.  Ukraine is more western the more west you go and more eastern the more east you go, which leaves it vulnerable to civil war.
Economically and politically, Ukraine has not been successful. It is one of the few countries that is poorer than it was before the Soviet Union fell apart. The culprit seems to be a combination of uncompetitive legacy Soviet industry and corrupt leadership. Corruption is a plague in many countries, including the US. But Ukraine is really corrupt, roughly as bad as Russia.
Competing Perspectives
The perspectives of the main players look almost irreconcilable. The bottom line is Russia has vastly superior military force and can seize Ukraine at will and the US is trying to convince Putin he will pay a high price for doing so. It is very risky.
Russia’s Perspective: NATO is an aggressor and the CIA is fomenting opposition to the Kremlin in the historical bedrock of the Orthodox world, Kiev. The Biden Administration is weak, exhausted by war and, as evident in Afghanistan, won’t stick by allies. Ukraine’s leadership is hostile and weak. It’s time to seize Ukraine before it slips into the hands of the West.
Ukraine’s Perspective – We have rapacious neighbors (including Germany) and a bloody history, including an administered famine under Stalin. The latest of many invasions began in 2014. Russian forces have killed thousands and the KGB successor tried to murder a Ukrainian President. Give us anti-tank and anti-aircraft missiles and we will defend ourselves. Our institutions are weak but under the leadership of Zelensky improving. We gave up our nukes in 1994 under the guarantee our borders would not shift.2
US Perspective – Where exactly is Ukraine? Our critical problems are inflation and COVID.  Putin is a thug who we would have liked to ignore, but we can’t if Russia is invading a country. NATO is a defensive force,3 that was dying until Putin’s behavior resuscitated it. Given that we won’t put soldiers on the ground or use our Air Force, we can’t stop an invasion.
Europe (Germany) Perspective – We like Russian energy but don’t want impoverished Ukrainian refugees pouring into Poland. The best thing to do is negotiate with Russia. This will take time, but all of the European Union is just one big negotiation. Russia isn’t part of any significant European institutions and should be.
Charts
The charts below illustrate the above. (Rose Technology, an incredible data-visualization start-up, makes them). Russia exports oil, Germany uses that to build machinery. Ukraine exports more agricultural goods and oil products. For the US, trade is simply less important.

Ukraine is poor and corrupt, only slightly less corrupt than Russia4.

Russia has massive foreign exchange reserves, a huge trade surplus (thanks to high oil prices) and low debt. The US is the opposite. This makes Russia harder to sanction.

How to Invest?
I am a) holding less stocks (particularly in Europe) b) a lot less bonds and c) more commodities or commodity linked stocks. Here is my logic:
·      Stocks. While earnings are going to be strong, price to earnings ratios (the price you pay for those earnings) are high, particularly in the US, and equities globally are quite correlated. Tightening isn’t good for PEs, invasions are worse. Implication: lower equity exposure, particularly in Europe.
·      Commodities. In the event of an invasion, aggressive sanctions are possible, including on raw material exports. Oil could go well past $100.  Implication: own more commodities and commodity producing companies.
·      Bonds. Commodities are inflation. If we get a squeeze, inflation risks get worse, the Fed needs to tighten even more. Implication: hold less bonds, particularly short-term bonds.
·      Russian Assets. Dirt cheap IF they don’t invade, un-investible if they do.  The price to earnings ratio on Russian stocks is … 6! The price to earnings on US stocks is…23. If Putin invades and sanctions are applied not clear you can get your money back. Implication: avoid Russian assets. Tragically, disruptive foreign policy is starving Russian innovation of needed cheap capital.5
·      Tech – Less an investment implication than a dynamic: a conflict can be cyber as well as physical. Tech also creates transparency where before there wasn’t, like Twitter shots of Russian troop movements.
What might make this go away? Maybe deterrence plus throwing Russia a bone, like agreements over military exercises? War seems more likely. Any troop pull-back results in a massive rally in Russian assets.
OTHER:
Next Podcast: Next week, we release Season #4 of our podcast. Our first guest is Jonathan Yorke, author of Into the Woods and a genius on story, both their immutable structure and why they exist. I think you are going to love this podcast, which Still Press Producer Dave Manahan is putting the finishing touches on now. Here is an out take.
John Yorke Storytelling Preview
Ask Me Anything: Today at 2 PM Eastern. Subscribers should have all the details already.
Parting Images: As I researched Ukraine this week, I reflected on my own early experience with Russian tanks. I was 25, living in Moscow and witnessed enormous tanks fire on civilians. Terrifying. My friend (and podcast guest!) Paul Fetters took this picture after the hostilities ended.

I thought about this week’s post while walking along the beach shown below, snow mixed with sand. It is single digits in Connecticut. Russian gas heats Europe.

1
Investing is risky. You can and will lose money. A reader asked me about my background. In addition to the information cited above, I started as a reporter in Russia in the 1990s. During my 20+years on Wall Street, part of the time I focussed on Russia.
2
Budapest memorandum, 1994. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Budapest_Memorandum_on_Security_Assurances
3
NATO moved troops to the Baltics after Russia invaded Crimea.
4
We inverted the rankings from Transparency International, higher is worse.
5
I wrote about this in The Cost of Invading and The Talent Skedaddle.

The Physics of Story

I like a good framework. For instance, an equity (a stock) has just two moving parts, earnings and the price paid for those earnings. Earnings, in turn, are spending. A framework puts individual observations, like the price investors are willing to pay to own a company’s earnings, into logical context.
Given my bias, it was only natural that when I wrote my second book I tried to find a framework for story. Season #4 episode #1 (click here) guest John Yorke wrote the best book I’ve read on the topic, Into the Woods. According to John, story has a physics, immutable rules. Understanding his framework can help you understand any story, be it a film, book, origin myth or politician’s speech.
Structure
According to John, every story has three parts: an inciting incident or disruption, a struggle and a resolution. This is as true of Shakespeare as it is Harry Potter. Structures can get more intricate, but even the more intricate ones can be reduced to these three parts.
John’s classic illustration is Jaws. What could be more disruptive than a massive shark devouring, in the opening scene, a fit, young woman? I saw the film when I was 8 and still remember scenes vividly. At the end, of course, the shark dies. In between, there is a life and death struggle, unlikely alliances are formed. 
A sales pitch is another version of the same. When I worked at a bank on Wall Street, in retrospect I realized volatility was our shark. If markets were calm, there was less incentive to act and, as a result, less incentive to do a transaction with the bank.
When it comes to politics, John contrasted Hillary Clinton’s storytelling with Trump’s. Her slogan was “better together,” his “drain the swamp.”  Like Jaws, “drain the swamp” is visceral. I imagine a toxic brew of malarial mud. “Better together,” as John said, is “art house film.” The simpler the story the broader the reach.
For additional perspective, I asked the people at Rose Technology (to look at the Google trends around the two phrases.

To the degree searches reflect emotional impact, John’s instinct is accurate. Trump had better “shark.” To be sure, it is possible to build compelling narrative out of falsehood. Putin’s shark is NATO. While in reality a defensive force, Putin portrays NATO as an offensive force threatening Russia. Because Russia has been unsuccessfully invaded twice (Hitler and Napoleon) and successfully once (Genghis Kahn), threats of invasion are a compelling shark.
US political extremes have their own sharks. The Left’s shark is “oppression;” the Right’s is “liberty.” Wherever you fall in your political predilections, you are being fed a story, so best understand how they work. After digesting John’s wisdom that I began to look at the news differently.
The Best Stories
While stories can be used to manipulate, the best stories serve a purpose, they illustrate a truth, even if truth is ever shifting. Each generation is tying to share key lessons for the next generation. Love stories are about finding a mate, clearly important for the tribe to continue. As our definition of relationships evolve, stories must too. War stories remind us of how awful our penchant for violence is.
If a story is exceptional and you get lost in its magic and the structure disappears. That there is nonetheless a structure at work was not something I was never taught in school. John suggests there is a resistance to suggesting stories follow a formula, as if it somehow hollows out the art. I don’t see it that way. To the contrary, just like with the framework for a stock, the structure provides coherence.

What’s Going on In Markets
The basic dynamic is simple. The Fed is going to remove liquidity and the West is doing everything it can to dissuade Putin from invading Ukraine. At the same time, the economy is growing quickly.
So far, the bond market is responding to the Fed, not the Ukraine invasion risk, so yields are moving higher. I will give a more detailed update of my positions a bit later in the quarter. A short version is here, an update from my Wins and Losses post. THIS IS NOT INVESTMENT ADVICE, instead it is transparency on how I am navigating the markets for you to take or leave.
1. 	I remain outright short bonds in the US and have moved this short further out the yield curve. The Federal Reserve (central bank) is now expected to raise rates about six times this year.  
2. 	I have less overall equity exposure (about 25% down from 40%), selling positions as they went negative (such that there was no tax obligation). My overall exposure to US stock indexes is now negative 4%, though I am on net positive US stocks given long exposure to banks and oil companies.
3. 	I have increased overall commodity and commodity equity exposure, now up to 17%. Here, I have been picking individual stocks to create a customized exposure that an index can’t offer.
4. 	My overall (unaudited) returns are about zero for 2022. As of this writing, the US stock market was down about 6% and a 10-year US government bond is down about 3% year-to-date.
5. 	I believe the Fed is going to tighten, US stocks and bonds will fall further, there will be a huge benefit to owning safe havens that don’t fall (thus the stock picking) and at some point, I’d guess in roughly the middle of the year, inflation pressures will start to ease and there may be a time to buy US stock indexes and bonds again.
6. 	For people who aren’t actively trading (and I wouldn’t recommend that you do) the single simplest thing to do might be to have your dividends go into cash, as opposed to be reinvested automatically in the stock market. When the Fed has stopped its tightening, it’s probably a better time to buy, though of course timing this is extremely difficult.
7. 	Regarding Ukraine, the invasion risk is still high, but it may be getting harder for Putin to invade in part because the West knows his tactics too well. This is sort of what happened to Trump. Initially his “shark” wasn’t well understood, so it worked well. As his moves became better understood they also became less effective.
8. Regarding the economic recovery, I am currently in Cyprus. Outside my window, I’ve counted many cruise ships sitting empty. They have to park them somewhere. This is visible evidence both of what true business risk looks like and also that some parts of the economy remain completely dead and will bounce very hard when Covid finally (years from now?) disappears. This monster is parked right outside my door.
Other:
What I am reading:
Energy and Civilization by Vaclav Smil. Another “framework” is man’s search for energy. Our legs and arms are relatively weak. Mechanical advantage magnifies our strength. Today’s inventions, like this computer and Substack and high-speed connection I write with, come after generations of brutal work to learn to harness energy. Think hunter-gatherer→farmer→dam-driven mill owner→gasoline driven tractor driver where now one person can do the work that used to require hundreds and hundreds. That is productivity. Today’s concern about global warming comes after hundreds of thousands of years of being concerned about having enough to eat. Many of us have forgotten what it is to feel hungry. Alleviating that sense of hunger was perhaps the original motivation to develop fossil fuels.
